Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 19.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20107-201
Act, how cited.

Sections 7-201 to 7-209 shall be known and may be cited as the Legal Education for Public Service Loan Repayment Act.

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 19.